New York, session 2025-2026, A6372.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The commissioner of the department of transportation, in 2 consultation with the commissioner of the office for people with devel- 3 opmental disabilities and any other department, division, board, bureau, 4 commission, agency or public authority of the state or any political 5 subdivision thereof deemed necessary by the commissioner of transporta- 6 tion and the commissioner of the office for people with developmental 7 disabilities, shall conduct a statewide study and review of the trans- 8 portation of individuals with developmental disabilities. Such study 9 shall include, but not be limited to, geographic location challenges, 10 the availability of transportation for people with developmental disa- 11 bilities, the decision making authority for non-emergency Medicaid 12 transportation, and any unique concerns based on regional issues. The 13 study shall also look at how community homes are currently determined 14 and how such homes will be determined going forward taking into account 15 transportation availability and options. 16 § 2. The commissioner of the office for people with developmental 17 disabilities and the commissioner of transportation shall, on or before 18 the thirty-first of December next succeeding the effective date of this 19 act, submit a report of such study, including detailed recommendations 20 and findings, to the governor, the temporary president of the senate, 21 the speaker of the assembly, the minority leader of the senate, the 22 minority leader of the assembly, and the chairs of the senate and assem- 23 bly mental health and transportation committees. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03705-01-5